Mississippi, session 2026, HB1887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Humphreys County, Mississippi, in its discretion, is authorized to contribute an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) during calendar year 2026, out of any available funds of the county, to the Improved Benevolent Protective Elks of the World Hill Lodge #811, an active nonprofit organization, which is classified as a 501(c)(8) Fraternal Beneficiary Society, that provides needed community and civic services to the residents of Humphreys County. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.